Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB931.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
(2) "Trust fund" means the foster child tutoring and academic assistance trust fund
established in Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The cabinet shall establish and operate a Tutoring and Academic Assistance
Grant program for children in foster care.
(2) The purpose of the program shall be to coordinate and facilitate tutoring and
academic assistance between school districts and community organizations in
order to improve graduation rates and create stability in learning careers for
children in foster care.
(3) The cabinet shall establish processes and procedures for school districts and
community organizations to apply for grants from the trust fund in order to
provide tutoring and academic assistance services to children in foster care.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the foster child tutoring and academic assistance trust fund. The fund
shall consist of grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made
available for the purposes of the trust fund.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the cabinet.
(3) Moneys in the trust fund shall be used to support tutoring and academic
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2495
assistance services to children in foster care in the Commonwealth and shall be
awarded by the cabinet in accordance with Section 2 of this Act.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed